District of Columbia statutes.
4-344

Establishment of the Adoption Voucher Fund.

(a)

There is established the Adoption Voucher Fund (“Fund”). The Fund shall be comprised of $2 million of the $5 million appropriated in the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 2000, approved November 29, 1999 (Pub. L. No. 106-113; 113 Stat. 1501), and additional funds in their entirety which Congress may appropriate from time to time for the purpose of providing incentives for foster parents to adopt District children.

(b)

Monies in the Fund shall be used only for the payment of homestudies and attorneys’ fees, as well as any administrative costs directly associated with the implementation of this subchapter. The Fund shall be the sole source of payments under the Program.

(c)

Funds deposited in the Fund shall not revert to the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of the fiscal year or at any other time, but shall remain available until expended for the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section, subject to authorization by Congress in an appropriations act.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 3805, 47 DCR 6308
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 5302, 51 DCR 8441

History

D.C. Law 15-205 added subsec. (c).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 3805 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3802 to 3807 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5302 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5302 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Emergency Legislation

Short title of subtitle C of title V of Law 15-205: Section 5301 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle C of title V of the act may be cited as the Adoption Voucher Fund Amendment Act of 2004.

Short Title